Hawaii statutes.
[§15D-6] Methods of registering to vote. (a) To apply to register to vote, in addition to any other
approved method, a covered voter may use the federal postcard application, or
the application's electronic equivalent for all elections conducted in the
State.

(b) A covered voter
may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot to
apply to register to vote simultaneously with the submission of the federal
write-in absentee ballot, if it is received no later than thirty days prior to
the election pursuant to section 11-16.

(c) The chief
election officer shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described
in section 15D-4(b) is capable of accepting both a federal postcard application
and any other approved electronic registration application sent to the
appropriate election official. The voter may use the electronic transmission
system or any other approved method to register to vote. [L 2012, c 226, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next